Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.710.270

Appropriations from Washington opportunity pathways account.

The state legislature shall, at each regular session in an odd-numbered year, appropriate from the Washington opportunity pathways account for the current use of charter public schools amounts as determined in accordance with RCW 28A.710.280, and amounts authorized under RCW 28A.710.230(1), for state support to charter schools during the ensuing biennium.

[ 2016 c 241 s 127.]